District of Columbia statutes.
29-609.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“General partner” means a partner in a partnership and a general partner in a limited partnership.

(2)

“Limited partner” means a limited partner in a limited partnership.

(3)

“Limited partnership” means a limited partnership created under Chapter 2 of this title, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

(4)

“Partner” includes both a general partner and a limited partner.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

1981 Ed., § 41-159.1.
2001 Ed., § 33-109.01.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 901 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Editor's Notes